Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.68.030

Receiving or granting unlawful compensation.

(1) A person is guilty of receiving or granting unlawful compensation if:

(a) Being a public servant, he or she requests, accepts, or agrees to accept compensation for advice or other assistance in preparing a bill, contract, claim, or transaction regarding which he or she knows he or she is likely to have an official discretion to exercise; or

(b) He or she knowingly offers, pays, or agrees to pay compensation to a public servant for advice or other assistance in preparing or promoting a bill, contract, claim, or other transaction regarding which the public servant is likely to have an official discretion to exercise.

(2) Receiving or granting unlawful compensation is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 388; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.68.030.]